Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 5 Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement
24-5-118. Benefits — Annuity options.

Before the date the first payment of an annuity becomes due, but not thereafter, a person about to become a retirant may elect, in lieu of a straight life annuity as set forth in § 24-5-115, to have the annuity reduced and to nominate a beneficiary, as provided by Option A or Option B:

Option A.

Under Option A, an annuity payable to the retirant shall be reduced by an amount calculated to provide an actuarially equivalent benefit to the annuity payable under § 24-5-115.

This subdivision (a)(1)(A) shall apply to all members and retirants.

If the retirant dies before having received one hundred twenty (120) monthly payments of the reduced annuity, the reduced annuity to which the retirant would have been entitled, if living, shall be paid for the remainder of the one-hundred-twenty-month period to such person as the deceased retirant shall have nominated by written designation, duly executed and filed with the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System.

If the beneficiary does not survive the retirant, the retirant may name another beneficiary, or failing to name a beneficiary, the annuity reserve for the annuity for the remainder of the one-hundred-twenty-month period shall be paid to the retirant's estate.

If the beneficiary survives the retirant but dies before the end of the one-hundred-twenty-month period, the annuity reserve for the annuity for the remainder of the one-hundred-twenty-month period shall be paid to the beneficiary's designated beneficiary; or

Option B.

Under Option B, an annuity payable to the retirant and surviving beneficiary shall be reduced by an amount calculated to provide an actuarially equivalent benefit to the annuity payable under § 24-5-115.

The reduction factor is calculated as the ratio of the actuarial present value of a joint and a fifty percent (50%) survivor annuity to the actuarial present value of the annuity payable under § 24-5-115.

The present values are calculated using standard actuarial formulas and based on a mortality table and discount interest rate calculated by the plan's actuary.

This subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i) applies to all members and retirants.

Upon the retirant's death, one-half (½) of the reduced annuity to which the retirant would have been entitled, if living, shall be paid to the surviving beneficiary for the remainder of his or her life, if the beneficiary was either the retirant's spouse for at least two (2) years immediately preceding the first payment due date of the retired member's annuity or another person age forty (40) or older on the first payment due date receiving more than one-half (½) of his or her support from the retirant for at least two (2) years immediately preceding the first payment due date of the retired member's annuity.

If both the retirant and his or her named beneficiary die before the annuity payments have amounted to the sum of the member's accumulated contributions and interest that is vested at the date of retirement, the difference between the benefits paid and the member's contribution account at the date of retirement shall be paid to the estate of the person to whom the last annuity preceding death was paid.

If no annuities had been paid prior to the member's death, then the balance in the member's account shall be paid to the member's estate.

Should the eligible beneficiary of a member retirant who selected Option B predecease the member retirant, or if divorce or other marriage dissolution occurs, or should the beneficiary who is not a spouse cease to be a qualified beneficiary, then the retirant, by written notification to the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, may cancel Option B chosen at retirement and return to a straight life annuity, to be effective the month following receipt of the notification by the system.

The straight life annuity so elected shall then be the amount of the Option B annuity at the date of notification, less any increase that is excluded from the base annuity, multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is one hundred (100) and the denominator of which is the percentage of the straight life annuity that the retirant received at the date of retirement, plus the nonbase increase that was excluded in the computation. The effect of the foregoing shall be that the retirant's monthly annuity, after cancellation of Option B, shall be the same amount that it would have been had a straight life annuity been selected at the date of retirement.

No further changes in benefit options for retirants shall be permitted.

If an active member with five (5) or more years of credited service, including credited service for the year immediately preceding his or her death, dies in employer service before retirement, the applicable benefits provided in this section shall be paid upon written application to the board. It is the intent of this section to include all surviving spouses or beneficiaries, regardless of the time of the death of the member.

The effective date of the benefits provided in this section shall in no event be prior to the first day succeeding the member's death.

A member's surviving spouse who was married to the member at least the one (1) year immediately preceding his or her death shall receive an annuity computed in the same manner in all respects as if the member had:

Retired the date of his or her death with entitlement to an annuity provided for in § 24-5-115;

Elected the Option A survivor annuity provided for in subdivision (a)(1) of this section; and

Nominated his or her spouse as joint beneficiary provided for in subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 454, § 12; 1971, No. 246, § 1; 1975, No. 599, § 3; 1983, No. 464, § 2; 1985, No. 106, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1912; Acts 1987, No. 119, § 1; 1987, No. 315, § 1; 1997, No. 347, § 6; 1997, No. 1053, § 17; 1997, No. 1067, § 1; 1999, No. 1508, § 7; 2003, No. 205, § 1; 2013, No. 1134, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Because of an apparent engrossment error, Acts 2003, No. 205, § 1 added the following language to subdivision (a)(2)(B)(iii):

“except under subsection (e) of this section”. The Arkansas Code Revision Commission has removed this language from subdivision (a)(2)(B)(iii) pursuant to the commission's authority under § 1-2-303.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “(a)(2)(A)(i) applies” for “(a)(2)(B)(i) shall apply” in (a)(2)(A)(i)

(d)

24-5-119. Redetermination of benefits.

Beginning with the July 1 which is at least twelve (12) full months after the effective date of each benefit, the amount of each benefit shall be redetermined, and the redetermined amount shall be payable for the ensuing year.

The redetermined amount shall be the amount of the benefit otherwise payable as of the immediately preceding July 1 increased by the lesser of three percent (3%) or the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers as determined by the United States Department of Labor over the one-year period ending in the December immediately preceding the date for which the redetermined amount is being calculated.

However, the redetermined amount of the benefit to be paid shall not be less than the redetermined amount of the benefit paid in the preceding year.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 599, § 4; 1979, No. 821, § 2; 1983, No. 479, § 2; 1985, No. 611, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 76-1912.4, 76-1912.6; Acts 1987, No. 809, § 4; 1995, No. 407, §§ 1, 4; 1999, No. 335, § 1; 2017, No. 610, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (b) as (b)(1); in (b)(1), inserted “the lesser of” and added “or the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers as determined by the United States Department of Labor over the one-year period ending in the December immediately preceding the date for which the redetermined amount is being calculated”; and added (b)(2).

24-5-120. Increase in monthly retirement benefit — Schedule.

Effective July 1, 1987, the monthly retirement benefit payable to the retirees and beneficiaries of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System who retired prior to July 1, 1985, and who receive an annuity for July 1987, shall be increased by no more than fifteen percent (15%) of the annuity received for June 1987.

The fifteen percent (15%) increase shall be in accordance with the following schedule:

Retired Percent Increase After 6-30-85
0% 7-1-83 through 6-30-85
1% 7-1-82 through 6-30-83
2% 7-1-81 through 6-30-82
3% 7-1-80 through 6-30-81
4% 7-1-79 through 6-30-80
5% 7-1-78 through 6-30-79
6% 7-1-77 through 6-30-78
7% 7-1-76 through 6-30-77
8% 7-1-75 through 6-30-76
9% 7-1-74 through 6-30-75 10% 7-1-73 through 6-30-74 11% 7-1-72 through 6-30-73 12% 7-1-71 through 6-30-72 13% 7-1-70 through 6-30-71 14% Before 7-1-70 15%

Click to view table.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 479, § 1; 1985, No. 611, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1912.5; Acts 1987, No. 809, § 3.

24-5-121. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning life annuities for a surviving spouse, was repealed by Acts 2011, No. 564, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1971, No. 458, § 1; 1973, No. 185, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 76-1916.

24-5-122. Early retirement incentives.

Any member of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System who retires as provided in § 24-5-112, shall receive an annuity consisting of the benefits provided in §§ 24-5-115 and 24-5-118, provided the member is an active member of the system on March 12, 1987, and is vested for a full age and service annuity on March 12, 1987, and has credit in the system for thirty-six (36) consecutive months of actual service with the system immediately prior to the member's effective retirement date, and he or she may choose two (2) of the retirement incentives from subdivisions (a)(2)-(5) of this section, provided the member retires during the period between March 12, 1987, and January 1, 1988, inclusive.

In addition to the member's regular annuity, the system will pay to the State Employees Group Insurance Plan, or a successor plan by whatever name it may be known, the total insurance premium for the health, hospitalization, and basic life insurance for the member only, provided that the member was insured by the state group plan at the date of retirement.

For the purpose of computing the member's annuity, the highest twelve (12) months' salary for which contributions have been paid to the system will be substituted for the member's average compensation as provided by §§ 24-5-112 and 24-5-114 — 24-5-118.

For the purpose of computing the member's annuity, an additional service credit equal to ten percent (10%) shall be added to the member's service credit at the date of retirement, even though the service thus added exceeds the thirty-five (35) years maximum stated in § 24-5-112(b).

The retiring member may receive a retirement bonus which is a lump-sum payment equal to ten percent (10%) of the final twelve (12) months' actual salary earned by the member to the date of retirement, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

The retirement bonus shall be paid from funds appropriated to the system.

An active member of the system on March 12, 1987, whose benefits are vested and who is entitled to a reduced annuity as provided by § 24-5-114 on July 1, 1987, and who has credit in the system for thirty-six (36) consecutive months of actual service with the system immediately prior to the effective retirement date may choose two (2) of the retirement incentives from subdivisions (b)(2)-(6) of this section, provided the member retires during the period July 1, 1987, through January 1, 1988, inclusive.

In addition to the member's reduced early annuity, the system will pay to the State Employees Group Insurance Plan, or to a successor plan by whatever name it may be known, the total insurance premium for the health, hospitalization, and basic life insurance for the member only, until the retired member has attained age sixty-five (65) years of age, provided that the member was insured by the state group plan at the date of retirement.

For the purpose of computing the member's reduced annuity, the highest twelve (12) months' salary, for which contributions have been paid to the system, will be substituted for the member's average compensation as provided by §§ 24-5-112 and 24-5-114 — 24-5-118.

If the member is eligible for an early reduced annuity as provided by § 24-5-114 and is within two (2) years of full annuity age, then the member's annuity will not be reduced because of early retirement.

If the member has attained the full benefit age as provided by § 24-5-114 and is within two (2) years of attaining the service requirement for a full annuity, then the member's annuity will not be reduced because of early retirement.

The retiring member may receive a retirement bonus which is a lump-sum payment equal to ten percent (10%) of the final twelve (12) months' actual salary earned by the member to the date of retirement, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

The retirement bonus shall be paid from funds appropriated to the Arkansas Department of Transportation for salaries.

Any employee of the department retired under this law shall not be eligible for subsequent employment, as an employee, by any state agency whose employees are covered by a state-supported retirement system.

For those department employees who retire pursuant to this section, the amount paid by the system as the cost of the employee's health and basic life insurance shall not exceed the amount of the employer's contribution for the coverage on the date of the employee's retirement and may be reduced at the time the employee qualifies under Medicare or Medicaid programs.

Any future increase in the cost of this coverage shall be borne by the employee and not by the system from which the employee retired.

No position being vacated as a result of an employee's retiring pursuant to this section shall be filled without the written approval of the Governor or the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 187, §§ 5-9; 2017, No. 707, §
282.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 17, § 3, provided: “It is the intent of the act was to give fair and equal treatment to all employees and all elected officials under the Early Retirement Incentive Act.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (b)(6)(B).

24-5-123. Credit for military service.

Any person who is a member of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System shall be entitled to purchase creditable service in the system for a period not to exceed three (3) years for active service rendered by the member in the United States Armed Forces, after the member's first employment in a position covered by a state-supported retirement system, excluding active service for the purpose of attending schools or other peacetime training of the member in the military reserve or national guard, if the person:

Has ten (10) years of creditable service with this retirement system;

Received an honorable discharge from the armed forces;

Is not receiving federal military service retirement pay, excluding federal military disability retirement pay;

Is not qualified to claim the military service in the system under § 24-2-502 or § 24-5-101 et seq.; and

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(5)(B) of this section, contributes to the members' deposit account a sum of money equal to an amount based on an actuarial equivalent as prescribed by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System.

Subdivision (a)(5)(A) of this section does not apply if this section conflicts with the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. § 4301 et seq., as in effect on February 1, 2011, as it provides for employees who leave employment for active military service.

Interest shall be paid at the rate of six percent (6%) per year from December 31, 1987, or six (6) months after the end of the month in which the member first has ten (10) years of creditable service, whichever is later.

In no event may payments be extended beyond three (3) years from the date of application.

It is further required that all payments must be completed before this military service time can be used to compute annuity benefits at time of retirement.

This section shall be supplemental to any other laws relating to the members of the system. Nothing in this section shall be construed to repeal or modify any existing provisions of this system's laws providing for creditable service in the system for military service, nor to diminish the right of any member of this system to obtain creditable service in the system for military service under existing laws.

In no event shall any member of this system be entitled to receive in excess of five (5) years of creditable service for military service rendered by the member.

No member shall be eligible for creditable service in more than one (1) state-supported retirement system.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 455, §§ 1, 2; 2011, No. 564, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added the (a)(5)(A) designation and rewrote (a)(5)(A); and inserted (a)(5)(B).

24-5-124. Minimum monthly benefit.

All persons who are now vested or who hereafter vest under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System shall be entitled to a minimum monthly benefit of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

History.

Acts 1989, No. 547, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 547, § 2, provided:

“All persons who on the effective date of this Act receive benefits under the Public Employees Retirement System or the State Highway Employees Retirement System, and whose monthly benefits are less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per month, shall have their monthly benefits increased to one hundred and fifty dollars ($150) per month effective with the first benefit payment payable after the effective date of this Act.”

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-5-101 — 24-5-109, 24-5-112 — 24-5-118, and 24-5-204 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 547, § 1, is also codified as § 24-4-611.

24-5-125. Eligibility to receive increase in benefits.

In order to help offset the cost of health insurance and health care, a member who is receiving benefits from the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System before, on, or subsequent to July 1, 1999, shall have added to his or her annuity as determined under § 24-5-115 no less than the sum of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per month, provided that:

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System may elect and is granted the authority to increase that additional monthly sum to all such eligible individuals in an amount determined by the board as necessary to help offset the ever-escalating costs of health insurance and health care;

The additional monthly sum shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per month; and

A member who initiates receiving benefits:

July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2009, has at least five (5) years of service in the system; or

July 1, 2009, has at least ten (10) years of service in the system.

No benefit enhancements provided by this section shall be implemented if it would cause the publicly supported retirement system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed a thirty-year amortization.

In its discretion, the board may prorate the benefits provided under this section for any individual retiring after June 30, 1999, but before July 1, 2009, if the individual is also eligible for an additional monthly benefit as a result of credited service under one (1) or more of the other reciprocal systems, as such systems are enumerated in § 24-2-401.

A member who initiates receiving benefits on or after July 1, 2009, shall be eligible for a minimum increase in benefits as determined under § 24-5-115 under the following schedule:

A member who has accrued ten (10) years but less than fifteen (15) years of service in the system is eligible to receive sixty percent (60%) of the healthcare offset as provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section;

A member who has accrued fifteen (15) years but less than twenty (20) years of service in the system is eligible to receive eighty percent (80%) of the healthcare offset as provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section;

A member who has accrued twenty (20) years or more of service in the system is eligible to receive one hundred percent (100%) of the healthcare offset as provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section; and

If the member is receiving retirement benefits as a result of credited service under one (1) or more of the reciprocal systems, as such systems are enumerated in § 24-2-401, the board shall prorate the benefits provided under this section for all members retiring after August 16, 2013.

Nothing contained in this section shall require the system to pay any portion of the benefits provided for in this section.

Members from a reciprocal system will continue to receive their current benefits they are receiving under this section.

Beginning on July 1, 2019, § 24-5-119 shall not apply to an additional monthly benefit that is available to a member under this section.

A member shall continue to receive any previous increases to an additional monthly benefit that he or she received under § 24-5-119 before July 1, 2019.

Section 24-5-119 shall apply to all previous increases to an additional monthly benefit that a member received under § 24-5-119 before July 1, 2019.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 245, §§ 1-3; 1999, No. 311, § 1; 1999, No. 1066, § 7; 1999, No. 1325, § 8; 2005, No. 144, § 1; 2009, No. 439, § 1; 2013, No. 309, §§ 2, 3; 2019, No. 294, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to § 1-2-207, the amendment by Acts 1999, No. 311, is deemed to be superseded by the amendment by Acts 1999, Nos. 1066 and 1325. Acts 1999, No. 311, amended this section to read as follows:

“(a)

In order to help offset the costs of health insurance and health care, any individual who is receiving benefits from the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System prior to, on, or subsequent to July 1, 1999, shall have added to his or her annuity as determined pursuant to § 24-5-115 no less than the sum of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per month, provided, the board may elect and is granted the authority to increase that additional monthly sum to all such individuals in an amount determined by the board as necessary to help offset the ever escalating costs of health insurance and health care; provided; further, such additional monthly sum shall not exceed two hundred-fifty dollars ($250) per month. No benefit enhancement provided by this section shall be implemented if it would cause the publicly supported retirement system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed a thirty-year amortization.

“(b)(1)

If an individual is also receiving benefits as a result of credited service under one (1) or more of the other reciprocal systems as such systems are enumerated in § 24-2-401, that individual shall receive a pro rata portion of the amount set forth in subsection (a) of this section from the system.

“(2)

That pro rata portion shall be determined by dividing the years of creditable service with the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department by the member's or deceased member's total years of creditable service with all reciprocal systems, provided the individual receiving such benefits shall receive the additional amounts set out in subsection (a) of this section in total from such systems if the member or deceased member was employed at least five (5) years in each of the reciprocal systems.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (a)(1) substituted “a member” for “any individual,” “before” for “prior to,” “under” for “pursuant to,” and “provided” for “provide”; rewrote (a)(1)(C); in (b) inserted “but before July 1, 2009”; added (c) and redesignated the remaining text accordingly.

The 2013 amendment, in (c)(4), substituted “receiving retirement benefits” for “eligible for an additional monthly benefit,” “shall” for “in its discretion may”; and added (e).

The 2019 amendment added (f).

24-5-126. Increase in benefits.

Effective July 1, 1991, the monthly retirement benefit payable to the retirees and beneficiaries of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System who are entitled to receive an annuity for July 1991 shall be increased by four percent (4%) above the annuity such retiree or beneficiary received for June 1991.

The increase in benefits as provided in this section shall be added to the base annuity for the purpose of computing the annual postretirement increase as provided in § 24-5-119(a) for the benefit redetermination July 1, 1991, and for all years thereafter.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 380, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-5-101 — 24-5-109, 24-5-112 — 24-5-118, and 24-5-204 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

24-5-127. Creditable service.

Any employee of the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department or the Arkansas Department of Transportation who is a member of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System and who has served as a member of the State Highway Commission shall receive partial credit, equal to forty percent (40%) of the time the member served as a member of the commission, as creditable service.

For the purpose of calculating the member's annuity, the portion of creditable service attributed to serving on the commission shall not be considered when determining retirement eligibility, nor shall it be considered when calculating the annuity, but it is to be considered only toward vesting in the system.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 359, § 1; 2017, No. 707, §
283.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-5-101 — 24-5-109, 24-5-112 — 24-5-118, and 24-5-204 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “or the Arkansas Department of Transportation” in (a).

24-5-128. Increase in monthly retirement benefit — 1993.

Effective July 1, 1993, the monthly retirement benefit payable to the retirees and beneficiaries of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System who are entitled to receive an annuity for July 1993 shall be increased by two and nine-tenths percent (2.9%) above the annuity such retiree or beneficiary received for June 1993.

The increase in benefits as provided in this section shall be added to the base annuity for the purpose of computing the annual postretirement increase as provided in § 24-5-119(a) for the benefit redetermination July 1, 1993, and for all years thereafter.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 929, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-5-101 — 24-5-109, 24-5-112 — 24-5-118, and 24-5-204 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

24-5-129. Increase in monthly retirement benefit — Acts 1997, No. 349.

Effective July 1, 1997, the monthly retirement benefit payable to the retirees and beneficiaries of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System who are entitled to receive an annuity for July 1997 shall be increased by two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) above the annuity such retiree or beneficiary received for June 1997.

The increase in benefits as provided in this section shall be added to the annuity for the purpose of computing the annual postretirement increase as provided in § 24-5-119(a) for the benefit redetermination July 1, 1997.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 349, § 2.

24-5-130. Increase in monthly retirement benefit — Acts 1997, No. 386.

Effective July 1, 1997, the monthly retirement benefit payable to the retirees and beneficiaries of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System who are entitled to receive an annuity for July 1997 shall be increased by two percent (2%) above the annuity such retiree or beneficiary received for June 1997.

The increase in benefits as provided in this section shall be added to the annuity for the purpose of computing the annual postretirement increase as provided in § 24-5-119(a) for the benefit redetermination July 1, 1997.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 386, § 2.

24-5-131. Limitation on benefit enhancement of Acts 1997, No. 1089.

No benefit enhancement provided for by § 24-5-116 shall be implemented if it would cause the publicly supported retirement system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed a thirty-year amortization. No benefit enhancement provided for by § 24-5-116 shall be implemented by any publicly supported system which has unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities being amortized over a period exceeding thirty (30) years until the unfunded actuarial accrued liability is reduced to a level less than the standards prescribed by § 24-1-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1089, § 2.

24-5-132. Limitation on benefit enhancement of Acts 1997, No. 1067.

No benefit enhancement provided for by § 24-5-118 shall be implemented if it would cause the publicly supported retirement system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed a thirty-year amortization. No benefit enhancement provided for by § 24-5-118 shall be implemented by any publicly supported system which has unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities being amortized over a period exceeding thirty (30) years until the unfunded actuarial accrued liability is reduced to a level less than the standards prescribed by § 24-1-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1067, § 2.

24-5-133. Early participation.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System shall present to the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs information concerning the statutory authority and actuarial appropriateness of proposed board actions to establish or revise any benefit or a provision of a deferred retirement option plan.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1325, § 7.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-5-101 — 24-5-109, 24-5-112 — 24-5-118, and 24-5-204 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

24-5-134. Death benefit enhancement.

Beginning on March 1, 2001, the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System shall pay an amount not to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) to the named beneficiary of the retiree or a member in the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Deferred Retirement Option Plan immediately following the retiree's death.

If there is more than one (1) named beneficiary, the amount shall be divided equally between the named beneficiaries.

If there are no designated persons surviving the retiree or plan member, the lump sum shall be paid to the estate.

If a retiree or a plan member is entitled to a similar benefit from a reciprocal system, then the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System shall pay a prorated share based on the number of years in the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System divided by the total public service time.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 482, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-5-101 to 24-5-133 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

24-5-135. Annuity benefit enhancement.

Beginning July 1, 2001, the monthly retirement benefit payable to the retirees and beneficiaries of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System who are entitled to receive an annuity for July 2001 shall be increased by four and eight-tenths percent (4.8%) above the annuity the retiree or beneficiary received for June 2001.

The increase in benefits as provided in this section shall be added to the annuity for the purpose of computing the annual postretirement increase as provided in § 24-5-119(a) for the benefit redetermination July 1, 2001.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 539, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-5-101 to 24-5-133 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

24-5-136. Operation of system as qualified trust.

The Executive Secretary of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System shall operate the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System and interpret any provisions of this chapter consistent with the requirements under the Internal Revenue Code as it existed on January 1, 2007, and applicable United States Treasury regulations as they existed on January 1, 2007, to permit the system to be operated as a qualified trust under, 26 U.S.C. § 401(a), the Internal Revenue Code as it existed on January 1, 2007.

Notwithstanding any language to the contrary under this chapter, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System may promulgate rules consistent with subsection (a) of this section.

Any rule promulgated under this section that is found to be in conflict with an applicable provision of Arkansas law is void.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 399, § 1.

24-5-137. Compliance with Internal Revenue Code section 415.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, benefits paid under this chapter shall not exceed the limitations of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S. Code § 415, as it existed on January 1, 2011, that are applicable to governmental plans.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System may promulgate rules to implement the limitations of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S. Code § 415, as it existed on January 1, 2011, including, to the extent necessary, the payment of any benefit limited by the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S. Code § 415, as it existed on January 1, 2011, under an arrangement described in the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S. Code § 415(m), as it existed on January 1, 2011.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 16, § 2.

Subchapter 2
— Deferred Retirement Option Plan

Effective Dates.

Acts 1997, No. 1073, § 7: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the retention of experienced employees, especially in skilled labor positions and highway engineers, is beneficial to the Arkansas highway system and with the hiring of employees at younger ages, more qualified and experienced employees are reaching retirement eligibility earlier in their careers and that immediate passage of the act is essential to the efficient administration of state government and implementation of the provisions of this act is necessary to begin at the start of the State's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 1325, § 14: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 311 of 1999 changes the amount of additional monthly benefits in the State Highway Employees' Retirement System and they are necessary for the continued financial stability of the current retirees, that clarifications are needed in order to make Act 311 take effect in an orderly fashion, that these changes in Act 311 must then take effect at the same time Act 311 becomes effective, and that it is necessary to implement the changes in benefits at the beginning of the current fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act, except for Sections 2 and 3, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2003, No. 776, § 2: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the benefits for members of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System are inadequate; that the benefits should be increased to continue to motivate the highway department employees of our state government; that the most beneficial time to increase the benefits is during the beginning of the state fiscal year; and this act is necessary to take effect at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

24-5-201. Establishment.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System may establish a deferred retirement option plan for its members so that, in lieu of terminating employment, they might continue with employment and accept a service retirement benefit pursuant to § 24-5-101 et seq. The board shall be authorized to promulgate rules for a plan to provide this deferred retirement option to its members as is appropriate to maintain a goal of zero (0) cost to the system.

The board shall be authorized to promulgate rules for a plan to provide this deferred retirement option to its members as is appropriate to maintain a goal of zero (0) cost to the system.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1073, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2868.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a) and (b).